Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 27

Uniform Testamentary Additions To Trusts Act

Publisher's Notes. Former chapter 27, concerning uniform testamentary additions to trusts, was repealed by implication by Acts 1995, No. 751, §§ 1-6. The former chapter was derived from the following sources:

28-27-101. Acts 1963, No. 483, § 1; 1971, No. 320, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-601.

28-27-103. Acts 1963, No. 483, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-603.

28-27-105. Acts 1963, No. 483, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-604n.

For Comments regarding the Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 751, § 6: August 1, 1995.

28-27-101. Testamentary additions to trusts.

A will may validly devise or bequeath property to the trustee of a trust established or to be established (i) during the testator's lifetime by the testator, by the testator and some other person, or by some other person including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although the trustor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts, or (ii) at the testator's death by the testator's devise to the trustee, if the trust is identified in the testator's will and its terms are set forth in a written instrument, other than a will, executed before, concurrently with, or after the execution of the testator's will or in another individual's will if that other individual has predeceased the testator, regardless of the existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust. The devise or bequest is not invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or the testator's death.

Unless the testator's will provides otherwise, property devised or bequeathed to a trust described in subsection (a) is not held under a testamentary trust of the testator, but it becomes a part of the trust to which it is devised or bequeathed, and must be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the governing instrument setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto made before or after the testator's death.

Unless the testator's will provides otherwise, a revocation or termination of the trust before the testator's death causes the devise or bequest to lapse.

Ark. L. Rev.

Carroll, Uniform Laws in Arkansas, 52 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

The Arkansas Trust Code: Good Law for Arkansas. 27 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 191.

Cited: Sutter v. Sutter, 345 Ark. 12, 43 S.W.3d 736 (2001).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 751, § 1.

28-27-102. Effect on existing wills.

This chapter applies to a will of a testator who dies after July 31, 1995.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 751, § 2.

28-27-103. Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 751, § 3.

28-27-104. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act of 1995.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 751, § 4.

28-27-105. Savings clause.

The repeal of any statutory provision by this chapter does not impair, or otherwise affect, any will, devise, or bequest or any trust existing on August 1, 1995, nor does the repeal of any statutory provision by this chapter impair any contract or affect any right accrued before August 1, 1995.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 751, § 5.

28-27-106. Effective date.

This chapter takes effect on August 1, 1995.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 751, § 6.

Chapters 28-37

[Reserved.]

[Reserved]

28-27-102. Acts 1963, No. 483, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-602.

28-27-104. Acts 1963, No. 483, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-604.